Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.436

Developmental disabilities endowment—Program implementation and administration.

Based on the proposed operating plan under *RCW 43.330.225, and to the extent funds are appropriated for this purpose, the developmental disabilities endowment governing board shall implement and administer, or contract for the administration of, the developmental disabilities endowment program under the principles specified in *RCW 43.330.220. By December 1, 2000, and prior to implementation, the final program design shall be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature.

The secretary of the department of social and health services shall seek to maximize federal reimbursement and matching funds for expenditures made under the endowment program, and shall seek waivers from federal requirements as necessary for the receipt of federal funds.

The governing board may receive gifts, grants, and endowments from public or private sources as may be made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of the endowment program and may expend the gifts, grants, and endowments according to their terms.

[ 2000 c 120 s 8; 1999 c 384 s 7. Formerly RCW 43.70.736, 43.330.230.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.330.225 and 43.330.220 were recodified as RCW 43.70.735 and 43.70.734, respectively, pursuant to 2010 c 271 s 203. RCW 43.70.735 and 43.70.734 were subsequently recodified as RCW 43.330.435 and 43.330.434, respectively, pursuant to 2012 c 197 s 4.

Intent—Captions not law—1999 c 384: See notes following RCW 43.330.431.